Hawaii statutes.
§38-6 Certificates of deposit, deposit
receipts. At the time of depositing state money in any depository, the
director shall take certificates of deposit payable to the director in such
sums as the director deems advisable, or a receipt showing that the deposit is
subject to check. The certificates of deposit, receipts, and all balances of
these deposits shall be deemed and counted as cash. [L 1970, c 51, pt of §1;
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next